Utah statutes.
78B-4-502.   Donation of food -- Liability limits.

(1)  A person or entity who donates apparently wholesome food to a nonprofit organization for distribution to the needy is not subject to civil or criminal liability regarding the condition of the food unless an injury or death results from an act or omission of the donor that constitutes gross negligence, recklessness, or intentional misconduct.

(2)  A nonprofit organization that distributes either directly or indirectly apparently wholesome food to persons in need at no charge and substantially complies with applicable local, county, state, and federal laws and regulations regarding the storage and handling of food for public distribution is not subject to civil or criminal liability regarding the condition of the food unless an injury or death results from an act or omission of the organization that constitutes gross negligence, recklessness, or intentional misconduct.

